Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. 2023 c 441 s 6 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:The department of children, youth, and families shall submit to the appropriate committees of the legislature, in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, a preliminary progress report on licensing and oversight of residential private schools no later than July 1, ((2025))2026, and final report no later than July 1, ((2026))2027.Sec. 2. 2023 c 441 s 8 (uncodified) is amended to read as follows:Sections 2 and 4 of this act take effect July 1, ((2025))2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---